Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 11 Insurance of State Property

37-11-1.
Agreements for comprehensive coverage.

The director of administration, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized and directed to enter into agreements with one or more insurance companies for comprehensive insurance coverage on state property to protect the state against loss from fire and other risks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2090, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-11-1

.

37-11-2.
Restoration and replacement of property out of insurance proceeds.

Whenever state property is damaged or destroyed, the officer, board, division, department, or commission having charge of the state property shall promptly report the loss to the director of administration. The director of administration shall forthwith make an investigation for the purpose of determining whether or not the restoration or replacement of any of the property is necessary or desirable. The restoration or replacement as the director of administration shall deem necessary or desirable shall be paid for out of the recoveries from the insurance hereinbefore authorized. An appropriation is hereby made of so much of the recoveries as shall be required to pay the costs of the restoration and replacement ordered by the director. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment out of the insurance recoveries of such sums as may from time to time be required to pay for any restoration or replacement, upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2090, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-11-2

; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 9, § 4.